Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1841
Real property taxes; issuance of treasurer's tax deed; loss of tax sale certificate; procedure.

In case of the loss of any certificate, on being fully satisfied thereof by due proof, and upon bond being given to the State of Nebraska in a sum equal to the value of the property conveyed, as in cases of lost notes or other commercial paper, the county treasurer may execute and deliver the proper conveyance, and file such proof and bond with the register of deeds to be recorded as aforesaid.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 219, p. 470;

R.S.1913, § 6547;

C.S.1922, § 6075;

C.S.1929, § 77-2027;

R.S.1943, § 77-1841.